Hawaii, session 2026, GM8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. This Act is recommended by the governor for
immediate passage in accordance with section 9 of article VII of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.
PART II
SECTION 2. The legislature finds that the appropriation of
moneys for collective bargaining cost items associated with
labor grievances is necessary to support the fair and timely
resolution of employment disputes, maintain labor stability, and
ensure the continued effective operation of government services.
The legislature further finds that funding of these cost items
is in the public interest and necessary to carry out the State's
obligations under applicable collective bargaining agreements.
In addition, the legislature finds that the State may be
subject to potential liabilities arising from labor grievances
and that, in certain circumstances, it is prudent to appropriate
funds in anticipation of the resolution of such grievances. The
960793 .1

Page 2 2271
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
legislature further finds that such appropriations must not be
construed as establishing liability, resolving disputes, or
infringing upon the authority of the executive branch to
negotiate, settle, or otherwise resolve labor grievances.
Further, the legislature finds that the university of
Hawaii and certain departments, have used their existing fiscal
year 2025-2026 budget to pay collective bargaining cost items
related to temporary hazard pay in fiscal year 2025-2026. This
action caused a reduction in funds available for departmental
operations for the balance of fiscal year 2025-2026.
To address the anticipated departmental funding shortfalls
due to the temporary hazard pay payouts, a short-term general
fund loan will be deposited into a department of budget and
finance trust account. The departments shall reclassify the
collective bargaining cost items related to temporary hazard pay
expenditures from their fiscal year 2025-2026 operating general
fund appropriations to the trust account, thereby freeing the
appropriations in those operating budget accounts. Upon
enactment of this Act and the transfer of appropriated funds to
the departments, the departments shall reverse the
reclassifications so that the expenditures are restored to their
960793.3

Page 3 H.B. NO. 2271
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
original operating budget accounts, making the trust account
whole.
Accordingly, the purposes of this Act are to:
(1) Appropriate funds for labor grievances in a manner
that is expressly contingent upon the existence of a
legally binding obligation, such as an arbitration
award or order, court order, or executed settlement
agreement, while preserving executive authority,
ensuring compliance with applicable laws, and
maintaining appropriate fiscal controls; and
(2) Authorize the use of the general fund appropriations
made in this Act to restore the temporary
reclassifications for temporary hazard pay payouts to
the appropriate departments to provide for the
repayment of the general fund loan.
PART III
SECTION 3. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to fund collective
bargaining cost items associated with grievances filed under
agreements negotiated with the exclusive representative of
960793.3

Page 4 H.B. NO. 2271
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
collective bargaining units (1) and (10), and for their excluded
counterparts. The amounts are for arbitration awards for the
university of Hawaii and other executive branch departments and
a supplemental award for the other executive branch departments
related to temporary hazard pay. These amounts are in addition
to the amounts provided in Act 29, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025:
FY 2025-2026
General funds $66,795,019
Interdepartmental transfers $306,532
Revolving funds $203,736
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the appropriate
state departments for the purposes of this section:
(a) The appropriate state department may encumber funds
appropriated pursuant to this section for the purpose
of satisfying a potential obligation arising from the
labor grievance; provided that any such encumbrance
shall not constitute an obligation or expenditure of
funds; and
(b) The department may record an obligation in accordance
with applicable accounting and fiscal procedures,
subject to allotment and release by the director of
finance.
960793.3

Page 5 2271
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
SECTION 4. There are appropriated or authorized from the
sources of funding indicated below to collective bargaining
statewide (BUF 102) the following sums or so much thereof as may
be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 to fund collective
bargaining cost items associated with grievances filed under
agreements negotiated with the exclusive representative of
collective bargaining units (1) and (10), and for their excluded
counterparts. The amounts are for an anticipated settlement
agreement, arbitration award or order, or court order for the
department of education related to temporary hazard pay. These
amounts are as follows:
FY 2025-2026
General funds $28,468,723
Revolving funds $1,299
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department
of education for the purposes of this section; provided that:
(a) No funds shall be expended unless and until a legally
binding obligation to pay has been incurred by the
State, as evidenced by:
(1) A fully executed settlement agreement, duly authorized
by the State, arbitration award or order, or court
order; and
960793.3

Page 6 2271
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
(2) Any settlement agreement described in
subsection (a) (1) shall be approved as to form by the
department of the attorney general, and shall be
executed in accordance with applicable laws;
(b) The director of finance shall allot and release funds
appropriated under this section only upon written
notification by the department of education that the
conditions set forth in subsection (a) have been
satisfied;
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
supersede or impair the authority of the executive
branch, including the authority to negotiate, settle,
or otherwise resolve labor grievances, or to determine
whether and on what terms to enter into any settlement
agreement;
(d) The department of education may encumber funds
appropriated pursuant to this section for the purpose
of satisfying a potential obligation arising from the
labor grievance; provided that:
(1) Any such encumbrance shall not constitute an
obligation or expenditure of funds; and
960793.3

Page 7 2271
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
(2) Upon the occurrence of the condition described in
subsection (a) (1), the department of education may
record an obligation in accordance with applicable
accounting and fiscal procedures, subject to allotment
and release by the director of finance.
PART IV
SECTION 5. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
shall be allotted by the director of finance to the appropriate
state departments for expenditure in fiscal year 2025-2026 for
the purposes of this Act, including the repayment of general
fund loans by the general fund appropriations made in this Act,
which shall be deemed to be an authorized expenditure under the
general fund appropriations made in this Act.
SECTION 6. Neither this Act nor the appropriations made in
this Act shall be construed as an admission of liability, in any
arbitration, administrative proceeding, or court, nor as a
legislative determination of the merits of any grievance or
related litigation, nor as authority for the legislature to
resolve, settle, or adjudicate any grievance or related
litigation.
960793.3

Page 8 2271
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
PART V
SECTION 7. Part VI of Act 29, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025,
is amended by amending section 11 to read as follows:
"SECTION 11. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, shall not
lapse as of that date[7]; provided that any such unexpended or
unencumbered funds shall remain available for expenditure until
June 30, 2027."
PART VI
SECTION 8. Salary increases and cost adjustments provided
in this Act for any officer or employee whose compensation is
paid, in whole or in part, from federal, special, or other funds
shall be paid wholly or proportionately, as the case may be,
from the respective funds; provided that if the respective funds
are unable to support such payments, appropriations from other
means of financing may be used with the approval of the
governor.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any provision of this Act, with
the approval of the governor, the director of finance may
transfer unrequired balances from the appropriated funds as may
be available between sections 3 and 4 of this Act as necessary.
960793.3

Page 9 2271
H.B. NO.
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED
SECTION 10. Funds appropriated or authorized by this Act
that are not expended or encumbered by June 30, 2026, shall not
lapse as of that date; provided that any such unexpended or
unencumbered funds shall remain available for expenditure until
June 30, 2027.
SECTION 11. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
960793. 3

H.B. NO. 2271
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
PROPOSED